California, session 20252026, AB2152.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21080.74.5 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:21080.74.5. (a) At the discretion of a lead agency, an essential local fire station project may be eligible for judicial streamlining pursuant to this section if the lead agency makes, based upon substantial evidence in the record, all of the following determinations:(1) The project is not located on any of the following sites:(A) Prime farmland, farmland of statewide importance, or unique farmland as designated by the Department of Conservation.(B) Wetlands, as defined in Section 328.3 of Title 33 of the Code of Federal Regulations.(C) A hazardous waste site that is included on any list compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.(D) A floodplain, as mapped by the Federal Emergency Management Agency, unless the project includes adequate flood protection as determined by the lead agency.(E) Within a delineated earthquake fault zone, as determined by the State Geologist, in any official maps published by the State Geologist, unless the development complies with applicable seismic protection building code standards adopted by the California Building Standards Commission under the California Building Standards Law (Part 2.5 (commencing with Section 18901) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), and by any local building department under Chapter 12.2 (commencing with Section 8875) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(F) Lands identified for conservation in an adopted natural community conservation plan pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), a habitat conservation plan pursuant to the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), or other adopted natural resource protection plan.(G) Habitat for protected species identified as candidate, sensitive, or species of special status by state or federal agencies, fully protected species, or species protected by the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.), the California Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code), or the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).(H) Lands under conservation easement.(2) The project will employ best practices, as compared to similar fire station projects previously reviewed under this division, to avoid or mitigate significant environmental effects, including those environmental effects from noise, traffic, and hazardous materials.(3) The project’s construction, rehabilitation, and maintenance contracts in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) are covered by a project labor agreement, as that term is defined in Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.(b) (1) In making a determination under this section, the lead agency may rely on publicly available maps and data from state or federal agencies and shall not be required to prepare biological surveys, geotechnical studies, or other technical analyses.(2) The lead agency shall maintain documentation supporting that determination as part of the record of proceedings for the project. (c) The lead agency shall prepare and certify the record of proceeding proceedings pursuant to Section 21167.6.2.(d) Upon making a determination that a project, activity, or approval is eligible for judicial streamlining pursuant to this section, the lead agency shall file a notice of determination described in Section 21108 or 21152, as applicable, with the Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and the notice shall include a brief description of how the project satisfies the criteria in subdivision (a).(e) On or before July 1, 2027, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules of court that apply to any action or proceeding brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report, mitigated negative declaration, or negative declaration for an essential local fire station project, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, to be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 365 calendar days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court.(f) The judicial streamlining established pursuant to this section for an essential local fire station project shall apply only if the project applicant agrees to pay the costs of the trial court and the court of appeal in hearing and deciding any action or proceeding brought under this section in a form and manner as provided in a rule of court that the Judicial Council adopts, pursuant to subdivision (e), that shall include, but not be limited to, the costs for the appointment of a special master if deemed appropriate by the court.(f)(g) For purposes of this section, an “essential local fire station project” or “project” means a project undertaken by a city, county, or local fire agency to plan, design, and acquire property for, and construct, rehabilitate, or maintain, a fire station.